North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 6. Distribution and Withdrawal.

§ 59-601.
Interim distributions.

Except as provided in this Article, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before his withdrawal from the limited partnership and before the dissolution and winding up thereof to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the partnership agreement.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-602.
Withdrawal of general partner.

After filing of the original certificate of limited partnership, a general partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at any time by giving written notice to the other partners, but if the withdrawal violates the partnership agreement, the limited partnership may recover from the withdrawing general partner, in addition to its other remedies, any damages for breach of the partnership agreement and may offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable or payable to the partner.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 26.

§ 59-603.
Withdrawal of limited partner.

A limited partner may withdraw from a limited partnership only at the time or upon the happening of events specified in writing in and in accordance with the partnership agreement, including any amendment or addendum to the partnership agreement agreed upon by the partners unanimously or in accordance with the terms of the agreement and made in connection with any permitted withdrawal. If the partnership agreement does not specify in writing the time or the events upon the happening of which a limited partner may withdraw, a limited partner may not withdraw prior to the time for the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 27.

§ 59-604.
Distribution upon withdrawal.

Except as provided in this Article, upon withdrawal any withdrawing partner is entitled to receive any distribution to which the partner is entitled under the partnership agreement and, if not otherwise provided in the agreement, the partner is entitled to receive, within a reasonable time after withdrawal, the fair value of the partner’s partnership interest in the limited partnership as of the date of withdrawal, based upon the partner’s right to share in distributions from the limited partnership.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 28.

§ 59-605.
Distribution in kind.

Except as provided in writing in the limited partnership agreement, (1) a partner, regardless of the nature of his contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash; and (2) a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to him exceeds a percentage of that asset which is equal to the percentage in which he shares in distributions from the limited partnership.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-606.
Right to distribution.

Subject to the other provisions of Part 6 of this Article, at the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 29.

§ 59-607.
Limitations on distribution.

A partner shall not receive a distribution from a limited partnership to the extent that, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests, exceed the fair value of the partnership assets.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-608.
Liability upon return of contribution.

If a partner has received the return of any part of his contribution without violation of the partnership agreement or this Article, he is liable to the limited partnership for a period of one year thereafter for the amount of the returned contribution, but only to the extent necessary to discharge the limited partnership’s liabilities to creditors who extended credit to the limited partnership during the period the contribution was held by the partnership.

If a partner has received the return of any part of his contribution in violation of the partnership agreement or this Article, he is liable to the limited partnership for a period of six years thereafter for the amount of the contribution wrongfully returned.

A partner receives a return of the partner’s contribution to the extent that a distribution to the partner reduces the partner’s share of the fair value of the net assets of the limited partnership below the agreed value of the partner’s contribution which has not been distributed to the partner. As used in this section, the term “agreed value” means an amount or other measure of value as (i) is provided in the partnership agreement, or (ii) if not provided in the partnership agreement, is required to be set forth in the written records required pursuant to

G.S. 59-106

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 30.

§§ 59-609 through 59-700.

Reserved for future codification purposes.